Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.270

Guidelines for providing stipends and allowances to class one group members.

(1) By December 1, 2022, the office of equity shall develop uniform equity-driven guidelines for agencies on the issuance of stipends and allowances authorized under RCW 43.03.220 to provide for consistent application of the law. In developing the guidelines, the office of equity shall consult with stakeholders including, but not limited to, state agencies and impacted communities. The guidelines for providing allowances must include the reasonable allowances as prescribed by the office of financial management under RCW 43.03.050.

(2) Agencies exercising their authority under RCW 43.03.220 to provide stipends or allowances to members of class one groups shall adhere to the guidelines established under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2022 c 245 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2022 c 245: See note following RCW 43.03.220.